local_deploy/files/espanol.aff
flag *Z:        # Verbos transitivos pronominales irregulares en el gerundio
    E R		> -ER, ÉRMELO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRMELA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRMELOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRMELAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRTELO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRTELA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRTELOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRTELAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRSELO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRSELA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRSELOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRSELAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉROSLO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉROSLA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉROSLOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉROSLAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, ÉRNOSLES	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRMELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRMELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRMELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRMELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRMELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRMELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRTELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRTELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRTELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRTELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRTELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRTELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRSELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRSELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRSELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRSELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRSELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRSELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍROSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍROSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍROSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍROSLOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍROSLAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍROSLES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRNOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍRNOSLES	# comer > comerse

    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOMELO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOMELA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOMELE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOMELOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOMELAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOMELES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOTELO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOTELA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOTELE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOTELOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOTELAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOTELES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOSELO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOSELA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOSELE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOSELOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOSELAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOSELES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOOSLO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOOSLA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOOSLE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOOSLOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOOSLAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDOOSLES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDONOSLO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDONOSLA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDONOSLE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDONOSLOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDONOSLAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, YÉNDONOSLES	# traer > comerse
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOMELO	# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOMELOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOMELA	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOMELAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOMELE	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOMELES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOTELO	# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOTELOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOTELA	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOTELAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOTELE	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOTELES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOSELO	# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOSELOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOSELA	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOSELAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOSELE	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOSELES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOOSLO	# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOOSLOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOOSLA	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOOSLAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOOSLE	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDOOSLES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDONOSLO	# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDONOSLOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDONOSLA	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDONOSLAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDONOSLE	# incluir > incluyéndose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, YÉNDONOSLES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOMELO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOMELOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOMELA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOMELAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOMELE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOMELES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOTELO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOTELOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOTELA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOTELAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOTELE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOTELES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOSELO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOSELOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOSELA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOSELAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOSELE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOSELES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOOSLO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOOSLOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOOSLA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOOSLAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOOSLE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDOOSLES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDONOSLO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDONOSLOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDONOSLA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDONOSLAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDONOSLE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGIÉNDONOSLES
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOMELO		# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOMELOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOMELA		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOMELAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOMELE		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOMELES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOTELO		# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOTELOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOTELA		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOTELAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOTELE		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOTELES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOSELO		# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOSELOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOSELA		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOSELAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOSELE		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOSELES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOOSLO		# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOOSLOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOOSLA		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOOSLAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOOSLE		# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDOOSLES	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDONOSLO	# incluir > incluyéndomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDONOSLOS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDONOSLA	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDONOSLAS	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDONOSLE	# incluir > incluyéndose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUIÉNDONOSLES	# incluir > incluyéndose
